Louisiana, session 2026, HB1157.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Page 1 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
Section 1. R.S. 36:4(B)(39) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§4. Structure of executive branch of state government
* * *
B. The office of the governor shall be in the executive branch of state
government. The governor may allocate within his office the powers, duties, funds,
functions, appropriations, responsibilities, and personnel of the agencies within his
office and provide for the administration thereof and for the organization of his
office. The following agencies and their powers, duties, functions, and
responsibilities are hereby transferred to the office of the governor:
* * *
(39) The Louisiana State Infrastructure Bank (R.S. 48:81 et seq.).
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 48:77.3 and Subpart B of Part V of Chapter 1 of Title 48 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 48:81 through 87, are hereby enacted
to read as follows:
§77.3. Louisiana State Infrastructure Fund
A. There is hereby established in the state treasury, as a special fund, the
Louisiana State Infrastructure Fund, hereafter referred to in this Section as the
"fund." The following accounts are hereby established in the fund:
(1)(a) A special account to be designated and referred to in this Section as the
Highway Account.
(b) After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as
provided in Article VII, Section (9)(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the treasurer
shall deposit into the Highway Account the following:
(i) Monies transferred, appropriated, or dedicated to the Highway Account
by the legislature.
(ii) Federal funds as authorized by 23 U.S.C. 610.
(iii) Proceeds from federal credit instruments and programs, including those
administered by the United States Department of Transportation Build America
Bureau.
Page 2 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
(iv) Interest earned on the investment of monies in the Highway Account, and
repayments of principal and interest from loans made by the Louisiana State
Infrastructure Bank from the Highway Account.
(v) Any gift, grant, or donation designated for the Highway Account and
received by the state treasurer.
(c) Monies in the Highway Account shall only be used by the Louisiana
State Infrastructure Bank in connection with eligible infrastructure projects meeting
the funding eligibility requirements of Title 23 of the United States Code.
(2)(a) A special account to be designated and referred to in this Section as the
Transit Account.
(b) After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as
provided in Article VII, Section (9)(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the treasurer
shall deposit into the Transit Account the following:
(i) Monies transferred, appropriated, or dedicated to the Transit Account by
the legislature.
(ii) Federal funds as authorized by 23 U.S.C. 610.
(iii) Proceeds from federal credit instruments and programs, including those
administered by the United States Department of Transportation Build America
Bureau.
(iv) Interest earned on the investment of monies in the Transit Account, and
repayments of principal and interest from loans made by the Louisiana State
Infrastructure Bank from the Transit Account.
(v) Any gift, grant, or donation designated for the Transit Account and
received by the state treasurer.
(c) Monies in the Transit Account shall only be used by the Louisiana State
Infrastructure Bank in connection with eligible infrastructure projects meeting the
funding eligibility requirements of Title 49 of the United States Code.
(3)(a) A special account to be designated and referred to in this Section as the
Rail Account.
Page 3 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
(b) After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as
provided in Article VII, Section (9)(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the treasurer
shall deposit into the Rail Account the following:
(i) Monies transferred, appropriated, or dedicated to the Rail Account by the
legislature.
(ii) Federal funds as authorized by 23 U.S.C. 610.
(iii) Proceeds from federal credit instruments and programs, including those
administered by the United States Department of Transportation Build America
Bureau.
(iv) Interest earned on the investment of monies in the Rail Account, and
repayments of principal and interest from loans made by the Louisiana State
Infrastructure Bank from the Rail Account.
(v) Any gift, grant, or donation designated for the Rail Account and received
by the state treasurer.
(c) Monies in the Rail Account shall only be used by the Louisiana State
Infrastructure Bank in connection with eligible infrastructure projects meeting the
funding eligibility requirements of Subtitle V of Title 49 of the United States Code.
(4)(a) A special account to be designated and referred to in this Section as the
State-Funded Account.
(b) After allocation of money to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as
provided in Article VII, Section (9)(B) of the Constitution of Louisiana, the treasurer
shall deposit into the State-Funded Account the following:
(i) Monies transferred, appropriated, or dedicated to the State-Funded
Account by the legislature.
(ii) Interest earned on the investment of monies in the State-Funded Account,
and repayments of principal and interest from loans made by the Louisiana State
Infrastructure Bank from the State-Funded Account.
(iii) Any gift, grant, or donation designated for the State-Funded Account and
received by the state treasurer.
Page 4 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
(c) No funds authorized by Title 23 or Title 49 of the United States Code
shall be deposited into the State-Funded Account.
(d) Monies in the State-Funded Account may be used by the state
infrastructure bank in connection with any eligible infrastructure project allowed by
law.
B. Any use of federal credit instruments or programs to capitalize the bank
shall be subject to approval by the State Bond Commission.
C. All repayments of principal and interest from loans made by the Louisiana
State Infrastructure Bank shall be credited to the same account from which the loan
was originally provided.
D. Monies in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer in a separate
portfolio in the same manner as allowed for monies in the state general fund. While
monies from different accounts within the fund may be pooled for investment
purposes, the state treasurer shall maintain separate accountings for each account.
Earnings generated from investment of the monies in the fund shall be allocated
pro-rata among the accounts that generated the earnings. Monies in the fund shall
be available to pay costs directly attributable to investment, and shall be apportioned
pro-rata among the accounts that generated the costs.
E. All unexpended and unencumbered monies in the fund at the end of the
fiscal year shall remain in the fund.
* * *
SUBPART B. LOUISIANA STATE INFRASTRUCTURE BANK
§81. Definitions
For purposes of this Subpart, the following terms have the meanings ascribed
to them as follows:
(1) "Bank" means the Louisiana State Infrastructure Bank.
(2) "Board" means the board of directors of the bank.
(3) "Eligible costs" means the following:
Page 5 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
(a) For an eligible infrastructure project to be financed from the bank's
Highway Account, the costs permitted under Title 23 of the United States Code and
Code of Federal Regulations.
(b) For an eligible infrastructure project to be financed from the bank's
Transit Account, the costs permitted under Title 49 of the United States Code and
Code of Federal Regulations.
(c) For an eligible infrastructure project to be financed from the bank's Rail
Account, the costs permitted under Subtitle V of Title 49 of the United States Code
and Chapter II of Subtitle B of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.
(d) For an eligible infrastructure project to be financed from the bank's
State-Funded Account, all costs associated with the design, construction, or
improvement of public infrastructure, including but not limited to costs for
preliminary engineering, design, permitting, right-of-way acquisition, legal and
financial services, construction, and construction management, or the provision of
transportation services.
(4) "Eligible infrastructure project" means activities undertaken to plan,
design, construct, repair, maintain, or improve transportation facilities intended for
use by the public that have been permitted or approved by the applicable technical
and regulatory agencies pursuant to R.S. 48:85 and selected by the bank's board to
receive a loan or other financial assistance for the payment of eligible costs.
(5) "Financing agreement" means any agreement entered into between the
bank and a qualified borrower pertaining to a loan or other financial assistance,
including but not limited to a loan agreement, trust indenture, security agreement,
reimbursement agreement, guarantee agreement, bond or note, ordinance or
resolution, or similar instrument.
(6) "Financial assistance" means the provision of money or its equivalent
subject to an obligation of repayment in any manner authorized by law, including but
not limited to direct disbursements and revolving lines of credit.
(7) "Loan" means the provision of financial assistance by the bank to a
qualified borrower for all or part of the eligible costs of an eligible infrastructure
Page 6 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
project in exchange for corresponding obligations, including repayment owed by the
qualified borrower to the bank.
(8) "Political subdivision" means a parish, municipality, or any other unit of
local government, including a school board or special district, authorized by law to
perform governmental services.
(9) "Project revenues" means all rates, rents, fees, assessments, charges,
grants, appropriations, availability payments, pledged taxes, dedicated revenues, user
charges, insurance-related proceeds, and other receipts derived or to be derived from
an eligible infrastructure project or made available from a special source, including
revenues of any system of which the project is a part, as provided in an applicable
financing agreement.
(10) "Qualified borrower" means:
(a) Any political subdivision authorized to undertake, construct, operate, or
own an eligible infrastructure project.
(b) Any private entity, including a concessionaire or special purpose entity,
participating in an eligible infrastructure project with the approval or consent of the
relevant regulatory or technical agencies including but not limited to participants in
a public-private partnership, to the extent permitted by applicable law, provided that
the board determines that the assistance is adequately secured pursuant to R.S. 48:86.
§82. Louisiana State Infrastructure Bank; legislative findings; creation; purposes
A. The legislature finds the following:
(1) There is a critical need to increase investment in the development and
maintenance of Louisiana's transportation infrastructure to promote economic growth
and the ability of business and industry competition in regional, national, and global
markets and to improve the quality of life for the people of this state.
(2) While grant funding remains an important tool for infrastructure
investment, increasing project costs and expanding federal credit opportunities
require complementary financing mechanisms. A revolving loan program allows the
state to maximize available resources, protect taxpayers, and reinvest repayments
into future infrastructure needs.
Page 7 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
B. There is hereby created within the office of the governor the "Louisiana
State Infrastructure Bank", hereinafter referred to as the "bank", which shall be
allocated to the office of the governor as an agency of the state.
C. The purpose of the bank shall be to select and provide loans or other
financial assistance to qualified borrowers for financing eligible infrastructure
projects related to planning, constructing, improving, rehabilitating, and making
resilient infrastructure facilities necessary for public purposes.
D. Any loan or other financial assistance provided pursuant to this Subpart
shall be made pursuant to a financing agreement between the bank and a qualified
borrower.
E. The bank is established as a revolving loan and credit assistance program
that administers both federal and state funds in accordance with applicable federal
and state laws and regulations, except where required by applicable federal law, the
bank shall not provide grants. All assistance shall be structured to ensure repayment
and the continued revolving use of funds. Nothing in this Subpart shall be construed
to supersede or diminish the authority of any state agency to administer its existing
infrastructure programs.
§83. Louisiana State Infrastructure Bank; board of directors
A. The bank shall be governed, administered, and operated by a board of
directors composed of the following members:
(1) The director of the office of rural development or his designee.
(2) The chair of the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget or his
designee.
(3) The chair of the Joint Legislative Committee on Transportation,
Highways and Public Works or his designee.
(4) The secretary of the Department of Transportation and Development or
his designee.
(5) The secretary of Louisiana Economic Development or his designee.
Page 8 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
(6) One member appointed by a majority of the other members from among
three persons nominated by the Louisiana Bankers Association with not less than
five years of experience in commercial lending or investment banking.
(7) One member appointed by the State Board of Certified Public
Accountants of Louisiana with no less than five years of experience in accounting
and auditing standards.
B. Appointed members shall serve a term of three years. All vacancies shall
be filled in the same manner as provided in the original appointment.
C.(1) The board shall adopt bylaws and conduct meetings in accordance with
the Open Meetings Law.
(2) The director of the office of rural development or his designee shall serve
as chair of the board.
D. The board shall be staffed by the office of the governor, which may enter
into interagency agreements with the Department of Transportation and
Development, the Department of Treasury, and Louisiana Economic Development
for technical review, underwriting support, and program coordination.
§84. Board of directors; powers and duties
A. In addition to the powers contained in this Subpart, the board shall have
all powers necessary, useful, or appropriate to operate the bank and finance eligible
infrastructure projects, including but not limited to:
(1) Maintain perpetual succession.
(2) Pursue any necessary legal action upon written approval of the attorney
general and to be sued in the name of the bank.
(3) Adopt an official seal.
(4) Grant loans, acquire and sell loan obligations, and provide other financial
assistance pursuant to cooperative endeavor agreements.
(5) Enter contracts and execute financing agreements and related
instruments.
(6) Establish program rules and underwriting standards pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act, including risk management policies, portfolio
Page 9 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
concentration limits, and procedures for default and remedies. The procedures may
also include stress testing requirements and loss-reserve requirements consistent with
those applicable to commercial banks.
(7) Establish fiscal controls and accounting procedures.
(8) Enter into agreements with any agency or instrumentality of the United
States; agencies, instrumentalities, and political subdivisions of the state of
Louisiana; agencies, instrumentalities, and political subdivisions of another state; or
private individuals for the purpose financing eligible infrastructure projects.
(9) Procure insurance, guarantees, letters of credit, and other credit support.
(10) Borrow money with approval of the State Bond Commission.
(11) Issue bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness as provided in this
Subpart.
(12) Collect fees and charges in connection with loans or other assistance at
amounts either at or below the rates used by commercial banks.
(13) Accept and hold funds deposited with the bank by the federal
government, the state, governmental units, or private entities, with or without
payment of interest, as allowed by law.
(14) Establish advisory committees, including one or more technical review
committees comprised of representatives from the Department of Transportation and
Development, Department of Treasury, Louisiana Economic Development, and
office of rural development, to provide recommendations on project eligibility,
readiness for advancement, potential economic development benefits, environmental
compliance, or other matters requiring specialized technical expertise.
(15) Retain financial advisors, legal counsel, investment advisors, credit
analysts, servicers, and other professional services necessary to carry out the
purposes of the bank.
(16) Implement the bank in phases, including initial capitalization or lending
limits, and shall report to the legislature on program performance prior to expansion.
(17) Enter into agreements and take all actions necessary to receive,
administer, and comply with the requirements of any federal assistance program,
Page 10 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
including execution of assurances, certifications, and compliance instruments
required by applicable federal law.
B. Following the close of each fiscal year, the board shall submit an annual
report to the governor and the legislature no later than September first, including a
summary of capitalization, portfolio performance, defaults, leverage, and project
outcomes. The board shall also submit any additional reports required by the terms
of any agreements entered into pursuant to this Section to the governor and the
legislature annually no later than September first.
C. The board shall obtain an independent annual financial audit of the bank.
D. The bank shall receive approval by the State Bond Commission prior to
engaging in the following activities:
(1) Issuing bonds, notes, or other evidence of indebtedness of the bank.
(2) Providing any guarantee, pledge, or use of the credit, revenues, or taxing
power of the state.
(3) Any capitalization action or financing structure that constitutes or gives
rise to a debt or a moral obligation of the state.
E. The bank shall be authorized to expend monies of the fund, including loan
repayments, interest, fees, and investment earnings, for the reasonable and necessary
costs of administering and operating the bank. The administrative expenditures shall
be subject to annual approval by the board as part of an operating budget and shall
be made in accordance with applicable state and federal laws and regulations
governing the management and expenditure of public funds.
§85. Applications; eligibility; technical review
A. The board shall promulgate rules establishing the form and content of
applications, financing agreements, and other instruments utilized by the bank, and
may adopt provisions governing interest rates, terms, security, and repayment
sources.
B. Applications for financing shall be accompanied by at least one
recommendation of a state agency or political subdivision of the state certifying the
project as an eligible infrastructure project that will benefit the public.
Page 11 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
C. Prior to board action, each proposed project shall receive a technical
review by the applicable technical review committee, in the manner established by
rule.
D. In selecting projects that shall receive financial assistance from the bank,
the board shall consider feasibility, readiness, public benefit, risk, repayment ability,
and the amount of funding committed from sources other than the bank as necessary.
The board may assign priority to projects that will benefit rural or underserved
communities or that demonstrate limited access to traditional financing.
E. During the initial implementation phase of the bank, the board may
approve loans with reduced interest rates for a political subdivision that has
materially participated in the establishment, capitalization, or programmatic
development of the bank, provided that such loans are made pursuant to
board-adopted policies and remain subject to full repayment of principal. Any
reduced interest loan consideration shall be limited in duration and scope and shall
be disclosed in the annual report required by R.S. 48:84(B).
§86. Interest rates; repayment; terms; security; interception; remedies; purpose
A. Loans may bear interest at or below market; may be fixed, variable, or
adjustable; and may include subordinate or contingent repayment structures as
determined by the board. The board may modify, restructure, refinance, or otherwise
amend the terms of any loan or financial assistance in order to protect the financial
interests of the fund.
B. Repayment schedules shall be determined by the board, including the
ability to commence repayment based on substantial completion, revenue
commencement, or availability payment start, as provided in the financing
agreement.
C. The term of a loan shall not exceed thirty years after the date of the first
payment unless otherwise authorized by applicable federal law for federal accounts.
D. The board may require pledges of project revenues, dedicated taxes,
availability payments, credit enhancement, or other security as permitted in any
regulation or statute.
Page 12 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1157 ENROLLED
E. If a borrower fails to comply with contract terms or defaults, the board
may:
(1) Pursue legal or equitable remedies to ensure full repayment of any loan.
(2) Request that the state withhold from the borrower and deposit any state
monies into the fund as permitted in any regulation or statute.
(3) Draw on pledge reserves or credit facilities securing the obligation.
F. The bank is created solely as a public financing entity to provide loans and
other credit assistance for eligible public infrastructure projects, to leverage federal
and private capital, and to support state and local infrastructure investment. The
bank shall not accept deposits from the general public, provide consumer or
commercial banking services, or otherwise compete with private financial
institutions.
§87. Borrower authorization; resolutions; notice
Prior to executing a financing agreement, the board shall require submission
of the following:
(1) For political subdivisions, a resolution authorizing the agreement and
specifying the maximum principal, rate, term, and related terms.
(2) For private entities, evidence of authorization to enter into a binding
commitment with the bank and evidence of a public sponsor's recommendation as
required by law and board rule.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 13 of 13
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.